Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 5. Group Insurance Program.

§ 51.1-500.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Accident”
means
an accident covered under the group insurance coverage purchased by the Board.

“Board”
means
the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

“College savings trust account”
means
the same as that term is defined in §

23.1-700

.

“Company”
means
insurance company.

“Contributor”
means
the same as that term is defined in §

23.1-700

.

“Dependent child”
means
(i) the insured employee’s unmarried natural or legally adopted children who are not self-supporting; (ii) the insured employee’s unmarried stepchildren living full time with the insured employee in a parent-child relationship and who can be claimed as a dependent on the insured employee’s federal income tax return; (iii) any other children if they are in the insured employee’s court-ordered custody; or (iv) other dependent children of the employee’s family who are eligible for coverage under the family membership program offered under policies and procedures of the Department of Human Resource Management governing health insurance plans administered pursuant to §

2.2-1204

or §

2.2-2818

.

“Dismemberment”
means
a dismemberment covered under the group insurance coverage purchased by the Board.

“Eligible educational institution”
has the same meaning as that term is defined in § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Felonious assault”
means
a physical assault (i) by another person resulting in bodily harm to an insured employee; (ii) that takes place while such employee is performing his customary duties at the employer’s normal place of business or at other places the employer’s business requires him to travel; (iii) that involves the use of force or violence with the intent to cause harm; and (iv) that is a felony or misdemeanor under applicable law.

“Group insurance program”
or

“insurance program”

means
the plan covered under the policy purchased by the Board which provides group life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance coverage for employees.

“Immediate family member”
means
the insured employee’s spouse, children, parents, grandparents, grandchildren, brothers and sisters and their spouses.

“Qualified higher education expenses”
has the same meaning as that term is defined in § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Qualifying child”
means
a dependent child less than eighteen years of age, or if eighteen years of age or older a dependent child enrolled in high school.

“Retirement System”
means
the Virginia Retirement System.

“Safety restraint system”
means
a properly installed seatbelt, lap and shoulder restraint or other restraint approved by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration or any successor governmental agency. The term excludes an air bag safety system.

In addition to the definitions listed above, the definitions listed in §

51.1-124.3

shall apply to this chapter except as otherwise provided.

History.

1990, c. 832; 2001, cc. 685, 690; 2020, cc. 245, 374.

Cross references.

As to transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3203

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-700” was substituted for “23-38.75” in the definition of “Contributor” to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts 2001, cc. 685 and 690, cl. 2, provide: “That the additional benefits provided under this act shall apply to such deaths and dismemberments occurring on or after July 1, 2001.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 685 and 690 are identical, and added the paragraphs defining “Accident,” “Board,” “Contributor,” “Dependent child,” “Dismemberment,” “Felonious assault,” “Immediate family member,” “Qualifying child,” “Retirement System,” and “Safety restraint system.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 245 and 374 are identical, and added the definitions for “College savings trust account,” “Eligible educational institution” and “Qualified higher education expenses.”

§ 51.1-501.
Board authorized to purchase group life and accident insurance policies.

The Board is authorized to purchase group insurance policies to insure eligible employees.
The policies shall provide life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance and shall be purchased from and carried with a life insurance company authorized to do business in the Commonwealth and which maintains in the Commonwealth sufficient staff and facilities to efficiently administer and service the insurance.
Each policy shall contain a provision stipulating the maximum expense and risk charges that are determined by the Board to be on a basis consistent with the general level of charges made by life insurance companies under policies of group life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance issued to large employers.
The Board may require that the policies have reinsurance with a life insurance company incorporated or organized under the laws of and authorized to do business in the Commonwealth.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:1; 1968, c. 617; 1974, c. 353; 1985, c. 236; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-502.
Eligible employees and officers.

The following persons are eligible to participate in the group insurance program:

Teachers.

State employees.

Members of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System.

Members of the Judicial Retirement System.

Members of the Virginia Law Officers’ Retirement System.

Regular full-time employees of a political subdivision participating in the Virginia Retirement System, subject to Board approval. In order for coverage to become effective, seventy-five percent of the eligible employees must elect to become covered on the effective date of coverage. Limitation of waiver of group insurance as provided in this chapter shall be in effect for all employees after the effective date of coverage.

Regular full-time employees of a local school board who participate in the retirement system of a local government which provides group life insurance for its employees under this chapter.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:2; 1962, c. 542; 1968, c. 736; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 88, 185; 1972, c. 708; 1973, cc. 545, 546; 1974, cc. 353, 484; 1975, cc. 597, 611; 1976, c. 551; 1977, c. 620; 1980, c. 595; 1981, c. 478; 1982, cc. 467, 478; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 530; 2000, c. 911.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 911 added present subdivision 5 and redesignated former subdivisions 5 and 6 as present subdivisions 6 and 7.

§ 51.1-502.1.
Certain employees of teaching hospitals.

Any teaching hospital affiliated with an institution of higher education, other than the University of Virginia Medical Center, may purchase group life, accidental death and dismemberment, and disability insurance policies covering in whole or in part its employees who are health care providers, as determined by the Department of Human Resource Management pursuant to §

2.2-2905

. In addition, any such teaching hospital may increase the coverage under such policies to make available to each active insured employee optional life, accidental death and dismemberment insurance as provided in §

51.1-512

. All health care providers employed by such teaching hospital on or after July 1, 1992, shall be covered by the policies purchased by the teaching hospital as soon as such policies become effective and may not elect to be covered by the Board’s group insurance program under §

51.1-501

. Nor shall they be required to present at their own expense evidence of insurability satisfactory to an insurance company upon changing from one form of coverage to another provided by this chapter. No other section of this chapter shall apply to insurance coverage offered by a teaching hospital to which this section applies, except §§

51.1-510

and

51.1-511

.

Notwithstanding the definition of “state employee” contained in §

51.1-124.3

, a health care provider, as determined in accordance with subdivisions 18 and 19 of §

2.2-2905

, may be enrolled in a health care plan other than that provided for in §

2.2-2818

, at the election of a teaching hospital to which this section applies, and subject to the review and approval of the Secretary of Education.

History.

1992, c. 417; 1996, cc. 933, 995; 2000, cc. 66, 657.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 933 and 995, cls. 3 provide: “[t]hat any program of insurance established prior to July 1, 1996, by the University of Virginia Medical Center for health care provider employees pursuant to §

51.1-502.1

shall remain in effect until basic and optional programs of insurance have become effective pursuant to §

51.1-502.2

[see now §

2.2-2817.2

].”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 66 and 657 were identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

§ 51.1-502.2.
Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 694.

Cross references.

As to purchase of insurance covering the University of Virginia Medical Center, see §

2.2-2817.2

.

§ 51.1-502.3.
Certain employees of the Virginia Port Authority.

The Virginia Port Authority may purchase group life, accidental death and dismemberment, and disability insurance policies covering in whole or in part its employees who elect to participate in any retirement plan established under the provisions of §

51.1-126.4

. In addition, the Authority may increase the coverage under such policies to make available to each active insured employee optional life and accidental death and dismemberment insurance as provided in §

51.1-512

. All eligible employees of the Authority shall be covered by the policies purchased by the Authority as soon as such policies become effective and may not elect to be covered by the Board’s group insurance program under §

51.1-501

, nor shall they be required to present at their own expense evidence of insurability satisfactory to an insurance company upon changing from one form of coverage to another provided by this chapter. No other section of this chapter shall apply to insurance coverage offered by the Authority to which this section applies except §§

51.1-510

and

51.1-511

.

History.

1997, c. 232.

§ 51.1-503.
Limitation on coverage.

No person shall have more than one coverage under the group insurance program.
Any person employed in more than one position which provides coverage under the group insurance program shall elect one position on which his coverage shall be based by written notification to the Board.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.27; 1954, c. 241; 1960, c. 400; 1973, c. 523; 1978, c. 841; 1982, c. 467; 1984, c. 430; 1985, c. 490; 1987, c. 575; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-504.
Election of political subdivision to participate; approval by Board.

Any political subdivision which has group life insurance with any insurance company or nonprofit association may continue the coverage, but shall not participate in this group insurance program while the other group life insurance is in effect. Upon discontinuance of the other group life insurance, the political subdivision may request coverage for eligible employees under this group insurance program.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:3; 1964, c. 407; 1977, cc. 429, 620; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832; 1993, c. 895.

§ 51.1-505.
Amounts of life and accident insurance for each employee; reduction and termination of insurance.

Each employee to whom this chapter applies shall, subject to the terms and conditions thereof, be eligible to be insured for an amount of group life insurance plus an amount of group accidental death and dismemberment insurance, each amount equal to twice the amount of his annual salary. If an employee’s annual salary is not an even multiple of $1,000, his annual salary for purposes of this section shall be considered to be the next higher $1,000. For purposes of this section, the annual salary of a member of the General Assembly shall be his creditable compensation for his last full calendar year of service or his salary under § 30-19.11, whichever is greater, and shall include the full amount of any salaries payable to such member for working in covered positions, regardless of whether such salaries were paid, reduced, or not paid because of such member’s service in the General Assembly. The annual salary for an employee retired for service or disability on an immediate retirement allowance may be adjusted by the Board in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.).Subject to the conditions and limitations of the group insurance policy, the accidental death and dismemberment insurance shall provide payments as follows:

Click to viewFor any one accident, the aggregate amount of accidental death and dismemberment insurance that may be paid shall not exceed the maximum amount of accidental death and dismemberment insurance determined in accordance with this section.Notwithstanding the provisions of §

51.1-124.8

, the amount of life insurance for which an employee shall be eligible shall be equal to twice the amount of his annual salary without regard to the date of the employee’s qualification for a retirement allowance.

The amount of life insurance on an employee who retires for service on an immediate retirement allowance or who elects to postpone the receipt of his retirement allowance to some date other than his last day of service shall be the amount set forth in subsection A, reduced by an amount equal to 25 percent thereof on the January 1 following the first full year from the date the employee is separated from service and each January 1 thereafter. The amount of life insurance on an employee who retires for disability on an immediate retirement allowance shall be the amount set forth in subsection A on the date the employee last rendered service reduced by an amount equal to 25 percent thereof on January 1 following the first full year from the date the employee attains his “normal retirement date” as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, and each January 1 thereafter. If the employee by statute or Board regulation has been construed to be in service to the beginning of the next school year, the reduction shall not apply until the beginning of the next school year. The reduction shall not decrease the amount of life insurance on an employee to less than 25 percent of the amount of life insurance to which the initial reduction is applied, provided, however, that the reduction shall not decrease the amount of life insurance to less than $8,000 for employees with at least 30 years of creditable service, which amount shall be increased by the same percentage as any annual post-retirement supplement for retirees, as calculated for employees hired on or after July 1, 2010, pursuant to §

51.1-166

. For purposes of this subsection, an employee shall be deemed to have retired only if the employee has five or more years of service as an employee prior to the date of retirement. This requirement shall not be applicable if the employee is retired for disability.Any employee who was denied membership in the Retirement System because of having attained age 60 at the time of being employed or reemployed and who has five or more years of service immediately prior to separation from service shall retain the life insurance coverage as though he had retired on an immediate retirement allowance.

For any employee who at any time has at least 20 years of creditable service in any retirement plan administered by the Virginia Retirement System or other Virginia public plan participating in the group life program established by this chapter, the amount of group life insurance shall be an amount equal to twice the amount of the highest annual salary earned during such employment.The provisions of subsection B providing a reduction in the amount of life insurance shall apply to the amount of group life insurance as determined under this subsection for such employees with at least 20 years of creditable service.

The amount of life insurance for an employee who is retired for disability on an immediate retirement allowance, who also has attained age 55, and who elects to receive a retirement allowance as set forth in subsection C of §

51.1-160

, shall be reduced as set forth in subsection B. The reduction shall begin the January 1 following the first full year from the date the employee elects a service retirement allowance.

All accidental death and dismemberment insurance on an employee shall cease upon the earliest of (i) his separation from service; (ii) his failure to pay, in the manner prescribed by the Board, the contribution required for the first 24 months of leave without pay; (iii) if the employee has not returned to pay status, the expiration of 24 months of leave without pay; or (iv) his retirement.

Except in case of retirement as provided in subsections B, C, and D, all life insurance on an employee shall cease upon the earliest of (i) his separation from service; (ii) his failure to pay, in the manner prescribed by the Board, the contribution required for the first 24 months of leave without pay; or (iii) if the employee has not returned to pay status, the expiration of 24 months of leave without pay. Except in the case of retirement, life insurance shall be subject to a temporary extension of 31 days. During this 31-day extension, the employee may convert his life insurance into an individual policy of life insurance (without disability or other supplementary benefits) in any one of the forms, except term insurance, then customarily issued by the insuring company. The amount of life insurance which may be converted shall not exceed the amount of his life insurance under the group insurance policy at the time coverage is terminated. The insurance shall be converted to an individual policy (a) without evidence of insurability, (b) at the premium applicable to the class of risk to which he belongs, and (c) to the form and amount of the individual policy at his then attained age, provided application for the individual policy and payment of the first premium thereon is made to the issuing company within the 31 days. The right to convert to an individual policy as provided in §

38.2-3333

shall not apply upon termination of this group policy or elimination of a class of insured employees.Except as provided in subsection C, the amount of life insurance on each insured employee who retires shall be determined under the provisions of this chapter as it exists on the employee’s date of retirement.

Each employee of a public institution of higher education or of a local school board who remains in service until the completion of the school year and who makes contributions required to provide insurance coverage until service normally will be resumed the beginning of the next school year shall be deemed to be in service as an employee through the period to which the payments apply. If the employee is retired for service or disability during this period, contributions made by the employee shall be accepted and retained as proper.Each state employee of a public institution of higher education or a teaching hospital affiliated with a public institution of higher education who (i) is employed pursuant to a contract (a) that is for a term of employment of at least nine months and (b) that does not coincide with the normal scholastic year, (ii) remains in service until the completion of the contract year, and (iii) makes contributions required to provide insurance coverage until service normally will be resumed at the beginning of the next contract year shall be deemed to be in service as an employee through the period to which the payments apply. If the employee is retired for service or disability during this period, contributions made by the employee shall be accepted and retained as proper.

The limit of 24 months of leave without pay, after which accidental death and dismemberment insurance and life insurance shall cease, referred to in subsections E and F shall not apply to an employee who is on leave without pay while performing active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all members of the Virginia Retirement System who, on and after July 1, 1995, are covered under the group life insurance program created pursuant to this section and whose effective date of retirement is (i) before July 1, 1970, or (ii) on and after July 1, 1970.

Loss Amount Payable
For loss of life Full amount determined in accordance with the provisions of this section
Loss of one hand or One-half of the amount of one foot or loss determined in accordance of sight of one eye with the provisions of this section
Loss of two or Full amount determined in more such members accordance with the provisions of this section.

History.

1960, c. 604, §§ 51-111.67:2, 51-111.67:4; 1962, cc. 43, 542; 1964, c. 594; 1966, c. 174; 1968, c. 736; 1970, c. 774; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 88, 89, 185; 1972, c. 708; 1973, cc. 545, 546; 1974, cc. 353, 484; 1975, cc. 306, 309, 597, 611; 1976, cc. 551, 654; 1977, c. 620; 1978, c. 841; 1980, cc. 595, 637, 638; 1981, cc. 151, 478; 1982, cc. 467, 478, 639; 1984, c. 430; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 700; 1995, cc. 52, 307, 605; 1999, c. 111; 2001, c. 696; 2002, c. 313; 2003, cc. 9, 220; 2004, c. 102; 2005, cc. 147, 933, 945; 2006, c. 640; 2009, c. 362; 2010, c. 751; 2012, c. 696; 2015, c. 512.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1984, c. 430, cl. 3 provides that the provisions of this section shall be construed to be applicable to persons who have retired prior to July 1, 1984, as well as those who will retire subsequent to that date.

Acts 1991, c. 700, cl. 2 provides that in addition to applying prospectively, this act shall apply retroactively to provide life, accidental death and dismemberment insurance for any officer or employee of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth who, at the time of enactment or prior to the time of enactment, but subsequent to August 1, 1990, was engaged in federally funded active military duty.

Acts 2003, c. 220, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to eligible employees who retired or retire on or after July 1, 1999, provided that such employees are alive on or after July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2004, c. 102, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to eligible employees who retired or retire on or after July 1, 1999, provided that such employees are alive on or after July 1, 2004.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
“public institution of higher education” was substituted for “state institution of higher education” in subsection G to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 1999 amendment

deleted the former second paragraph in subsection A, which read: “With respect to any employee who is reemployed and insured under this chapter, the otherwise applicable amount of group life insurance shall be reduced by the amount of insurance provided by any policy issued under the conversion privilege pursuant to this chapter.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 696, in subsection B, substituted “twenty-five percent thereof on January 1 of the first full year” for “two percent thereof for each full calendar month” in two places, inserted “and each year thereafter” at the end of the first and second sentences, and inserted “initial” in the fourth sentence; and substituted “on January 1 of the first full year” for “at the end of the first full calendar month” in subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 313, in subsection B, substituted “the January 1 following the first full year from” for “January 1 of the first full year following” in the first sentence and substituted “each January 1” for “each year” in the first and second sentences; substituted “the January 1 following the first full year from” for “on January 1 of the first full year following” in the second sentence in subsection C; and redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) in the fifth sentence in subsection E.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 9 substituted figures for words in number references throughout the section, and in subsection B, deleted “continuous” preceding “service” in the fifth sentence of the first paragraph and in the second paragraph.

The 2003 amendment by c. 220 substituted figures for words in number references throughout the section; inserted present subsection C; redesignated former subsections C through G as subsections D through H; and in present subsection F, substituted “subsections B, C, and D” for “subsections B and C,” in the first paragraph, and inserted “Except as provided in subsection C” at the beginning of the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 102, in subsection C, substituted “20” for “25” three times, deleted “and is employed in a covered position within 24 months prior to his retirement earning an annual salary in such position less than the annual salary earned in his immediately prior covered position” following “by this chapter,” and substituted “during such employment” for “in his immediately prior covered position” in the first sentence of the first paragraph. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 147 deleted the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection C which read:
“For any employee who returns to covered employment after retiring with at least 20 years of creditable service in any retirement plan administered by the Virginia Retirement System or other Virginia public plan participating in the group life program established by this chapter, the amount of insurance shall be the greater of the amount of insurance he would have been eligible for had he remained a retiree or twice the amount of his current annual salary.”

The 2005 amendments by cc. 933 and 945 are identical, and added the last paragraph in subsection G.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 640 substituted “following the first full year from” for “of the first full year following” in the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 362 inserted subsection H and redesignated former subsection H as subsection I.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 751 substituted “The limit of 24 months of leave without pay, after which accidental death and dismemberment insurance and life insurance shall cease, referred to in” for “The provisions of” at the beginning of subsection H; and deleted “That” at the beginning of subsection I.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 696 deleted “of this title” at the end of the last sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; substituted “his ‘normal retirement date’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

” for “age 65” in the second sentence of the first paragraph in subsection B; deleted “of this section” at the end of the first sentence in subsection D; and in subsection F, in the first sentence, deleted “of this section” following “subsections B, C, and D” and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 512 inserted “provided, however, that the reduction shall not decrease the amount of life insurance to less than $8,000 for employees with at least 30 years of creditable service, which amount shall be increased by the same percentage as any annual post-retirement supplement for retirees, as calculated for employees hired on or after July 1, 2010, pursuant to §

51.1-166

.” in the fourth sentence of subsection B.

§ 51.1-505.01.
Additional accidental death and dismemberment benefits.

The group life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance coverage purchased by the Board shall include, but not be limited to, the following benefits:

If, as a result of an accident, an insured employee dies at least 75 miles from his principal residence, an additional accidental death benefit shall be paid for the preparation and transportation of the employee to a mortuary. The additional benefit shall be the lesser of the actual cost for such preparation and transportation or $5,000;

If an insured employee dies or suffers a dismemberment as a result of an accident that occurs while the employee is driving or riding in a private passenger vehicle, an additional accidental death or dismemberment benefit shall be paid, provided that (i) the private passenger vehicle is equipped with a safety restraint system; (ii) such safety restraint system was being used properly by the insured employee at the time of the accident, as certified in the official accident report or by the official investigating officer; and (iii) at the time of the accident, the driver of the private passenger vehicle held a current license to operate a private passenger vehicle and was not intoxicated, driving while impaired or under the influence of alcohol or drugs, as is defined or determined under applicable law.The additional benefit shall be the lesser of 10 percent of the amount otherwise payable due to such accidental death or dismemberment or $50,000.

Death or dismemberment from a felonious assault.

If an insured employee dies or suffers a dismemberment as a result of an accident caused by a felonious assault committed by other than an immediate family member, there shall be paid an additional accidental death or dismemberment benefit equal to the lesser of 25 percent of the amount otherwise payable due to such accidental death or dismemberment or $50,000.

In addition, if (i) an insured employee dies as a result of an accident caused by a felonious assault committed by other than an immediate family member, and (ii) such insured employee has a qualifying child at the time of such accident, a college savings trust account under the Virginia College Savings Plan (§

23.1-700

et seq.) shall be opened for each qualifying child. The Retirement System shall be the contributor of any such account and shall contribute into the account of each such qualifying child an amount approximately equal to the current average cost, as published by the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia, of four years of tuition and mandatory fees at baccalaureate public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth. The qualified beneficiary, as defined in §

23.1-700

, shall be the qualifying child on whose behalf such account was opened. Specific benefits of the college savings trust account shall be as defined by the Virginia College Savings Plan.Disbursements from a college savings trust account opened under this section shall be governed by procedures adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System in accordance with § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or other applicable federal law, and any other additional procedures as determined by the Board of the Virginia College Savings Plan. College savings trust account funds shall be payable only for qualified higher education expenses to a post-secondary eligible educational institution. Any funds in a college savings trust account that are not used by a qualifying child before the expiration of the time period for the use of such funds, as determined by the Virginia College Savings Plan, shall be paid to the Retirement System promptly after the expiration of such period.

History.

2001, cc. 685, 690; 2002, c. 313; 2020, cc. 245, 374.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-700” was substituted for “23-38.75” three times in subdivision C 2 to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts 2001, cc. 685 and 690, cl. 2, provide: “That the additional benefits provided under this act shall apply to such deaths and dismemberments occurring on or after July 1, 2001.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in subdivision C 2, substituted “baccalaureate” for “four-year” and “the Virginia College Savings Plan” for “§

23.1-700

et seq.”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 313 deleted “The Retirement System shall be the contributor for each savings trust account, and” at the beginning of the third sentence in subdivision C 2; and deleted the last paragraph, which read: “The Retirement System’s status as a contributor of a savings trust account shall not be considered in determining whether a qualifying child is eligible for in-state tuition. The provisions of § 23-38.86 shall apply to this section mutatis mutandis.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 245 and 374 are identical and in subdivision C 2, rewrote clause (ii) in the first sentence and the second sentence, which formerly read: “(ii) such insured employee has a qualifying child at the time of such accident, a savings trust account shall be opened for each qualifying child pursuant to the Virginia College Savings Plan (§

23.1-700

et seq.). The Retirement System shall contribute into the account of each such qualifying child an amount approximately equal to the current cost of purchasing in full a prepaid tuition contract for tuition and mandatory fees at a baccalaureate public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth, as determined under the Virginia College Savings Plan,” and inserted “college” in the last sentence; and in the last paragraph, rewrote the first and second sentences, which formerly read: “Funds in a savings trust account opened on behalf of a qualifying child shall be used for qualified higher education expenses at eligible institutions, both as defined in § 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or other applicable federal law, as determined by the Board of the Virginia College Savings Plan. Savings trust account funds shall not be disbursed prior to a qualifying child being admitted and enrolled at an eligible institution,” and inserted “college” in the last sentence.

§ 51.1-506.
Employee contributions; payroll deductions; effect of failure to deduct.

Each insured employee shall contribute to the cost of his insurance an amount to be determined by the Board but not to exceed the rate of $0.70 per month for each $1,000 of annual salary. If the annual salary is not an even multiple of $1,000, annual salary shall be considered to be the next higher $1,000. The employer shall deduct the premium from the salary payable to the insured employee. An employee who is paid on other than a monthly basis shall have an amount deducted at a proportionate rate, adjusted to the nearest cent. All deductions shall be retained by or paid to the State Treasurer to the credit of the Board and shall be available to the Board for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit any employer from making the contributions required herein for his employees, in whole or in part.

If the premium is not deducted from the employee’s salary and the failure to deduct is not the fault of the employee, the employee shall be insured and the employee shall not be required to pay the amount which should have been deducted.

Employees retired for service or disability shall not be required to contribute to the cost of their life insurance. If an employee is separated from the service of any public institution of higher education or of any local school board prior to completing a school year, the premiums paid shall be accepted and retained as proper to date of separation. If a state employee of a public institution of higher education or a teaching hospital affiliated with a public institution of higher education (i) is employed pursuant to a contract (a) that is for a term of employment of at least nine months and (b) that does not coincide with the normal scholastic year, and (ii) separated from service prior to completing the contract year, the premiums paid shall be accepted and retained as proper to the date of separation.

History.

1960, c. 604, §§ 51-111.67:5, 51-111.67:6; 1962, c. 43; 1966, c. 174; 1972, c. 841; 1974, c. 353; 1975, c. 597; 1980, c. 595; 1990, c. 832; 2005, cc. 933, 945.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
“public institution of higher education” was substituted for “state institution of higher education” in the third paragraph to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 933 and 945 are identical, and added the last sentence in the last paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 51.1-507.
Notice of desire not to be insured.

Any policy of insurance purchased under the authority of this chapter shall provide that all eligible employees shall be automatically insured.
Any employee who notified his employer that he desired not to be insured, or any employee of a political subdivision who notified his employer prior to the effective date of coverage that he desired not to be insured, may thereafter become insured only upon presentation at his own expense of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insuring company.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:6; 1962, c. 43; 1966, c. 174; 1974, c. 353; 1975, c. 597; 1980, c. 595; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-508.
Employer contributions.

Employers, other than the Commonwealth, shall pay to the Board the percentage of the premiums or charges not paid for by employee contributions. Employees paid from special funds shall have their employer contributions paid from such funds.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:9; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-509.
Keeping records and furnishing information required by Board.

Each employer, whose employees are insured under the provisions of this chapter, shall keep records and furnish information required by the Board.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:12; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-510.
Insurance exempt from process.

The insurance provided for in this chapter, including any optional insurance, and all proceeds therefrom shall be exempt from levy, garnishment, and other legal process, except (i) as provided in subsection B and (ii) for administrative actions pursuant to Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2 or any court process to enforce a child or child and spousal support obligation. However, the insured may make a voluntary, irrevocable assignment of his group life insurance and any individual conversion policy that may be issued upon termination of his group life insurance by executing an assignment on a form prepared by the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

From any insurance proceeds payable pursuant to this chapter to a retiree’s beneficiaries, the Board may deduct any overpayment of retirement allowance paid to such retiree.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:8; 1980, c. 643, § 51-111.67:12.1; 1990, c. 832; 1994, c. 883; 1997, c. 273; 2008, c. 354.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 354, in subsection A, substituted “The insurance” for “Except as provided in subsection B, the insurance” at the beginning and inserted the exception at the end of the first sentence.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (2006).